lt-LT: Homologacija / taisyklių rinkinys: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Nacionalinės / klubų lenktynės; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Trasos diena (nehomologuota); Kita
ru: Омологация или свод правил: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Национальные/клубные гонки; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Трек-дни (без омологации); Другое
zh-CN: 认证/规则组别: ACO; FIA; IMSA; 国家/俱乐部赛车; SRO GT 世界挑战赛; Super GT; 赛道日（非认证）; 其他
vi: Chứng nhận / bộ quy tắc: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Đua xe cấp quốc gia / câu lạc bộ; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Chạy track (không theo chuẩn); Khác
sv: Homologering / regeluppsättning: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Nationell / klubbracing; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track-day (ej homologerad); Annat
hu: Homologizáció / szabályrendszer: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Nemzeti / klubverseny; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Pályanap (nem homologizált); Egyéb
el: Έγκριση τύπου (Homologation) / σύνολο κανόνων: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Εθνικοί / Τοπικοί αγώνες; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track-day (χωρίς homologation); Άλλο
sl-SI: Homologacija/sklop pravil: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Nacionalne/klubske dirke; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Dan na dirkališču (nehomologirano); Drugo
de: Homologation/Regelwerk: ACO; FIA; IMSA; National/Club-Racing; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track-Day (nicht homologiert); Andere
cs: Homologace / sada pravidel: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Národní / klubové závody; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track-day (nehomologované); Jiné
pl: Homologacja / zestaw przepisów: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Wyścigi krajowe / klubowe; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track-day (bez homologacji); Inne
ja: 型式認証／規則セット: ACO; FIA; IMSA; ナショナル / クラブレーシング; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; トラックデー (非公認); その他
ro-RO: Omologare/set de reguli: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Curse naționale / de club; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Zi de circuit (neomologat); Altele
hr-HR: Homologacija / skup pravila: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Nacionalne / klupske utrke; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Dan na stazi (nehomologirano); Ostalo
bg-BG: Хомологация / набор от правила: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Национални/клубни състезания; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Тракдей (нехомологиран); Друго
es: Homologación o reglamento: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Nacional/carreras de club; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Día de pista (no homologado); Otro
nl: Homologatie / regelset: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Nationaal / clubracen; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track-day (niet-gehomologeerd); Overig
pt-PT: Homologação / conjunto de regras: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Nacional/clubes de corrida; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track day (não homologado); Outro
it: Omologazione/regolamento: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Gare nazionali / club; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track-day (non omologato); Altro
fr: Homologation ou règlement applicable: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Courses nationales / de club; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Sur piste (non homologué); Autre
ko: 승인/규칙 세트: ACO; FIA; IMSA; 내셔널 / 클럽 레이싱; SRO GT 월드 챌린지; 슈퍼 GT; 트랙 데이(미승인); 기타
nb: Homologering/regelsett: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Nasjonalt / klubbracing; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Trackday (ikke-homologert); Annet
pt-BR: Homologação/conjunto de regras: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Corridas nacionais / de clubes; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track day (não homologado); Outros
sk-SK: Homologizácia/súbor pravidiel: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Národné/klubové preteky; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Jazdy na okruhu (nehomologizované); Iné
da: Typegodkendelse/regelsæt: ACO; FIA; IMSA; National / klubracer; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Trackday (ikke-homologeret); Andet
fi: Tyyppihyväksyntä/sääntöjoukko: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Kansallinen / kerhokilpailu; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Ratapäivä (ei luokiteltu); Muu
tr: Homologasyon / kural seti: ACO; FIA; IMSA; Ulusal/kulüp yarışı; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track-day (onaylanmamış); Diğer
th: การรับรองมาตรฐาน / ชุดกฎเกณฑ์: ACO; FIA; IMSA; การแข่งระดับประเทศ/คลับ; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; แทร็กเดย์ (ไม่ได้ผ่านการรับรอง); อื่นๆ
en: Homologation / rule set: ACO; FIA; IMSA; National / club racing; SRO GT World Challenge; Super GT; Track-day (non-homologated); Other
zh-TW: 認證/規則集: ACO; FIA; IMSA; 國家級 / 俱樂部賽事; SRO GT 世界挑戰賽; Super GT; 賽道日 (無認證); 其他